Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Chapter 13. State Election Campaigns.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose concerning the 1996 amendments made by
ch. 48, SLA 1996 that relate to this chapter, see § 1,
ch. 48, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For construction of the 1996 amendments, see § 29,
ch. 48, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For severability of the provisions of
ch. 48, SLA 1996, see § 31,
ch. 48, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For contingent applicability of provisions of this chapter to persons other than individuals, see § 30,
ch. 48, SLA 1996. For criminal penalties for violations of this chapter, see
AS

15.56.012

—

15.56.199

.

For findings and intent for the 2020 [effective in 2021] changes to certain sections in this chapter, see sec. 1 of 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska Public Offices Commission: conflict of interest, campaign disclosure, legislative financial disclosure, and regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 73, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that amended certain sections in this chapter, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable. If any provision of this Act, or the applicability of any provision to any person or circumstance, shall be held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for chapter 108, SLA 2003 (Senate Bill 119), which added or amended various provisions in this chapter, see 2003 Senate Journal 407 — 408. For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 47, SLA 2007 (HB 109), which amended various provisions of this chapter, see 2007 House Journal 109 — 110.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 2-4, 6, 118(7), 216(1)-216(5).

Sec. 15.13.010.
Applicability.

This chapter applies

in every election for governor, lieutenant governor, a member of the state legislature, a delegate to a constitutional convention, or judge seeking judicial retention;

to every candidate for election to a municipal office in a municipality with a population of more than 1,000 inhabitants according to the latest United States census figures or estimates of population certified as correct for administrative purposes by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development unless the municipality has exempted itself from the provisions of this chapter; a municipality may exempt its elected municipal officers from the requirements of this chapter if a majority of the voters voting on the question at a regular election, as defined by AS

29.71.800

(20), or a special municipality-wide election called for that purpose, votes to exempt its elected municipal officers from the requirements of this chapter; the question of exemption from the requirements of this chapter may be submitted by the governing body by ordinance or by initiative election.

Except as otherwise provided, this chapter applies to contributions, expenditures, and communications made for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a ballot proposition or question as well as those made to influence the nomination or election of a candidate.

This chapter does not prohibit a municipality from regulating by ordinance election campaign contributions and expenditures in municipal elections, or from regulating those campaign contributions and expenditures more strictly than provided in this chapter.

This chapter does not limit the authority of a person to make contributions to influence the outcome of a voter proposition submitted to the public for a vote at a municipal election. In this subsection, in addition to its meaning under AS

15.13.065(c)

, “proposition” means a municipal reclassification, proposal to adopt or amend a home rule charter, a unification proposal, a boundary change proposal, or the approval of an ordinance when approval by public vote is a requirement for the ordinance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1974; am §§ 1, 2 ch 189 SLA 1975; am § 32 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 3, 4 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 1 SLA 2002; am § 28 ch 40 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in paragraph (a)(2) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” in accordance with § 91(a)(3), ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.011.
Inapplicability to presidential primary. [Repealed, § 1 ch 2 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 15.13.020.
Alaska Public Offices Commission.

There is created in the Department of Administration the Alaska Public Offices Commission consisting of five members. The governor shall appoint all members of the commission in the manner prescribed in (b) and (c) of this section, subject to confirmation by a majority of the legislature meeting in joint session.

The governor shall appoint two members of each of the two political parties or political groups with the largest number of registered voters at the time of the most recent preceding general election at which a governor was elected. The two appointees from each of these two parties or groups shall be chosen from a list of four names to be submitted by the central committee of each party or group.

The four members selected under (b) of this section shall, by a majority vote, nominate to the governor an individual to serve as the fifth member of the commission. The governor shall either appoint the nominee to the commission, or shall reject the nominee and request those four members to nominate another individual to serve as the fifth member of the commission.

Members of the commission serve staggered terms of five years, or until a successor is appointed and qualifies. The terms of no two members who are members of the same political party or political group may expire in consecutive years. A member may not serve more than one term. However, a person appointed to fill the unexpired term of a predecessor may be appointed to a successive full five-year term.

A member of the commission, during tenure, may not

hold or campaign for elective office;

be an officer of a political party, political committee, or group;

permit the member’s name to be used, or make any contributions whatsoever, in support of or in opposition to a candidate or proposition or question that appears on any ballot in the state, including that of a municipality; however, contributions may be made to a candidate for the office of President of the United States;

participate in any way in an election campaign or participate in or contribute to any political party; or

lobby, employ, or assist a lobbyist.

Members of the commission shall receive compensation of $50 a day while attending commission meetings and shall be entitled to travel expenses and per diem authorized by law for members of other boards and commissions.

The members shall elect a chairperson. Three members of the commission constitute a quorum. A vacancy does not impair the powers of the remaining members to exercise all of the powers of the commission.

A vacancy on the commission shall be filled through the appropriate appointing method for the position within 30 days after the occurrence of the vacancy. Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), the appointee shall serve for the remaining term of the appointee’s predecessor.

The commission may employ an executive director and other employees it considers necessary. Neither the executive director nor an employee may have a vote.

The commission shall establish an office, which may be called a regional office, in each senate district in the state to keep on file for public inspection copies of all reports filed with the commission by candidates for statewide office and by candidates for legislative office in that district; however, where one municipality contains more than one house district, only one commission office shall be established in that municipality. The regional office shall make all forms and pertinent material available to candidates. All reports shall be filed by candidates, groups, and individuals directly with the commission’s central district office. The commission shall ensure that copies of all reports by statewide and legislative candidates in each senate district are forwarded promptly to that district or regional office.

The commission shall ensure that copies of reports filed by candidates for municipal office are made available for public inspection in the appropriate municipality.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1974; am § 23 ch 25 SLA 1975; am §§ 3 — 10 ch 189 SLA 1975; am E.O. No. 41 § 2 (1980); am § 24 ch 85 SLA 1988; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 14 SLA 1989; am § 7 ch 80 SLA 1996; am § 38 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 43 ch 13 SLA 2019; §§ 4 and 5, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2000, in (g) of this section, “chairperson” was substituted for “chairman” in accordance with sec. 95(3), ch. 82, SLA 2000.

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (e)(3), deleted “but not limited to” following “including”, and made a related change.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (b), in the first sentence, substituted “or political groups with the largest number of registered voters at the time of” for “whose candidate for governor received the highest number of votes in” following “two political parties” and in the last sentence inserted “or groups” following “two parties” and “or group” following “each party”; in (d), in the second sentence, inserted “or political group” following “same political party”.

Sec. 15.13.030.
Duties of the commission.

The commission shall

develop and provide all forms for the reports and statements required to be made under this chapter, AS 24.45, and AS 39.50;

prepare and publish a manual setting out uniform methods of bookkeeping and reporting for use by persons required to make reports and statements under this chapter and otherwise assist all persons in complying with the requirements of this chapter;

receive and hold open for public inspection reports and statements required to be made under this chapter and, upon request, furnish copies at cost to interested persons;

compile and maintain a current list of all filed reports and statements;

prepare a summary of each report filed under AS

15.13.110

and make copies of this summary available to interested persons at their actual cost;

notify, by registered or certified mail, all persons who are delinquent in filing reports and statements required to be made under this chapter;

examine, investigate, and compare all reports, statements, and actions required by this chapter, AS 24.45, and AS 39.50;

prepare and publish a biennial report concerning the activities of the commission, the effectiveness of this chapter, its enforcement by the attorney general’s office, and recommendations and proposals for change; the commission shall notify the legislature that the report is available;

adopt regulations necessary to implement and clarify the provisions of AS 24.45, AS 39.50, and this chapter, subject to the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act); and

consider a written request for an advisory opinion concerning the application of this chapter, AS 24.45, AS

24.60.200

—

24.60.260

, or AS 39.50.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1974; am § 24 ch 25 SLA 1975; am §§ 11, 12 ch 189 SLA 1975; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 167 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 134 SLA 1990; am § 16 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 5 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 36 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For public official financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 1.

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

For Alaska public offices commission complaints and investigations, see 2 AAC 50, art. 3.

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 15.13.040.
Contributions, expenditures, and supplying of services to be reported.

Except as provided in (g) and (l) of this section, each candidate shall make a full report, upon a form prescribed by the commission,

listing

the date and amount of all expenditures made by the candidate;

the total amount of all contributions, including all funds contributed by the candidate;

the name, address, date, and amount contributed by each contributor; and

for contributions in excess of $50 in the aggregate during a calendar year, the principal occupation and employer of the contributor; and

filed in accordance with AS

15.13.110

and certified correct by the candidate or campaign treasurer.

Each group shall make a full report upon a form prescribed by the commission, listing

the name and address of each officer and director;

the aggregate amount of all contributions made to it; and, for all contributions in excess of $100 in the aggregate a year, the name, address, principal occupation, and employer of the contributor, and the date and amount contributed by each contributor; for purposes of this paragraph, “contributor” means the true source of the funds, property, or services being contributed; and

the date and amount of all contributions made by it and all expenditures made, incurred, or authorized by it.

The report required under (b) of this section shall be filed in accordance with AS

15.13.110

and shall be certified as correct by the group’s treasurer.

Every person making an independent expenditure shall make a full report of expenditures made and contributions received, upon a form prescribed by the commission, unless exempt from reporting.

Each person required to report under (d) of this section shall file a full report in accordance with AS

15.13.110(h)

on a form prescribed by the commission. The report must contain

the name, address, principal occupation, and employer of the individual filing the report;

an itemized list of all expenditures made, incurred, or authorized by the person;

the name of the candidate or the title of the ballot proposition or question supported or opposed by each expenditure and whether the expenditure is made to support or oppose the candidate or ballot proposition or question;

the name and address of each officer and director, when applicable;

the aggregate amount of all contributions made to the person, if any, for the purpose of influencing the outcome of an election; for all contributions, the date of the contribution and amount contributed by each contributor; and, for a contributor

who is an individual, the name and address of the contributor and, for contributions in excess of $50 in the aggregate during a calendar year, the name, address, principal occupation, and employer of the contributor; or

that is not an individual, the name and address of the contributor and the name and address of each officer and director of the contributor.

During each year in which an election occurs, all businesses, persons, or groups that furnish any of the following services, facilities, or supplies to a candidate or group shall maintain a record of each transaction: newspapers, radio, television, advertising, advertising agency services, accounting, billboards, printing, secretarial, public opinion polls, or research and professional campaign consultation or management, media production or preparation, or computer services. Records of provision of services, facilities, or supplies shall be available for inspection by the commission.

The provisions of (a) and (l) of this section do not apply to a delegate to a constitutional convention, a judge seeking judicial retention, or a candidate for election to a municipal office under AS

15.13.010

, if that delegate, judge, or candidate

indicates, on a form prescribed by the commission, an intent not to raise and not to expend more than $5,000 in seeking election to office, including both the primary and general elections;

accepts contributions totaling not more than $5,000 in seeking election to office, including both the primary and general elections; and

makes expenditures totaling not more than $5,000 in seeking election to office, including both the primary and general elections.

The provisions of (d) of this section do not apply to one or more expenditures made by an individual acting independently of any other person if the expenditures

cumulatively do not exceed $500 during a calendar year; and

are made only for billboards, signs, or printed material concerning a ballot proposition as that term is defined by AS

15.13.065(c)

.

The permission of the owner of real or personal property to post political signs, including bumper stickers, or to use space for an event or to store campaign-related materials is not considered to be a contribution to a candidate under this chapter unless the owner customarily charges a fee or receives payment for that activity. The fact that the owner customarily charges a fee or receives payment for posting signs that are not political signs is not determinative of whether the owner customarily does so for political signs.

Except as provided in (l) of this section, each nongroup entity shall make a full report in accordance with AS

15.13.110

upon a form prescribed by the commission and certified by the nongroup entity’s treasurer, listing

the name and address of each officer and director of the nongroup entity;

the aggregate amount of all contributions made to the nongroup entity for the purpose of influencing the outcome of an election;

for all contributions described in (2) of this subsection, the name, address, date, and amount contributed by each contributor, for all contributions described in (2) of this subsection in excess of $250 in the aggregate during a calendar year, the principal occupation and employer of the contributor, and for all contributions described in (2) of this subsection in excess of $2,000 in the aggregate during a calendar year, the true source of such contributions and all intermediaries, if any, who transferred such funds, and a certification from the treasurer that the report discloses all of the information required by this paragraph; and

the date and amount of all contributions made by the nongroup entity, and, except as provided for certain independent expenditures in AS

15.13.135(a)

, all expenditures made, incurred, or authorized by the nongroup entity, for the purpose of influencing the outcome of an election; a nongroup entity shall report contributions made to a different nongroup entity for the purpose of influencing the outcome of an election and expenditures made on behalf of a different nongroup entity for the purpose of influencing the outcome of an election as soon as the total contributions and expenditures to that nongroup entity for the purpose of influencing the outcome of an election reach $500 in a year and for all subsequent contributions and expenditures to that nongroup entity in a year whenever the total contributions and expenditures to that nongroup entity for the purpose of influencing the outcome of an election that have not been reported under this paragraph reach $500.

Every individual, person, nongroup entity, or group contributing a total of $500 or more to a group organized for the principal purpose of influencing the outcome of a proposition, and every individual, person, nongroup entity, or group contributing a total of $500 or more to a group organized for the principal purpose of filing an initiative proposal application under AS

15.45.020

or that has filed an initiative proposal application under AS

15.45.020

, shall report the contribution or contributions on a form prescribed by the commission not later than 30 days after the contribution that requires the contributor to report under this subsection is made. The report must include the name, address, principal occupation, and employer of the individual filing the report and the amount of the contribution, as well as the total amount of contributions made to that group by that individual, person, nongroup entity, or group during the calendar year.

Notwithstanding (a), (b), and (j) of this section, for any fund-raising activity in which contributions are in amounts or values that do not exceed $50 a person, the candidate, group, or nongroup entity shall report contributions and expenditures and supplying of services under this subsection as follows:

a report under this subsection must

describe the fund-raising activity;

include the number of persons making contributions and the total proceeds from the activity;

report all contributions made for the fund-raising activity that do not exceed $50 a person in amount or value; if a contribution for the fund-raising activity exceeds $50, the contribution shall be reported under (a), (b), and (j) of this section;

for purposes of this subsection,

“contribution” means a cash donation, a purchase such as the purchase of a ticket, the purchase of goods or services offered for sale at a fund-raising activity, or a donation of goods or services for the fund-raising activity;

“fund-raising activity” means an activity, event, or sale of goods undertaken by a candidate, group, or nongroup entity in which contributions are $50 a person or less in amount or value.

Information required under this chapter shall be submitted to the commission electronically, except that the following information may be submitted in clear and legible black typeface or hand-printed in dark ink on paper in a format approved by the commission or on forms provided by the commission:

information submitted by

a candidate for election to a borough or city office of mayor, membership on a borough assembly, city council, or school board, or any state office, who

meets the requirements of (g)(1) — (3) of this section; or

does not have reasonable access to the technology necessary to file electronically; in this sub-subparagraph, a candidate is considered not to have reasonable access to the technology necessary to file electronically if the candidate does not own a personal computer or does not have broadband Internet access at the candidate’s residence; in this sub-subparagraph, “broadband Internet access” means high-speed Internet access that is always on and that is faster than traditional dial-up access; or

a candidate for municipal office for a municipality with a population of less than 15,000; in this subparagraph, “municipal office” means the office of an elected borough or city

mayor; or

assembly, council, or school board member;

any information if the commission determines that circumstances warrant an exception to the electronic submission requirement.

The commission shall print the forms to be provided under this chapter so that the front and back of each page have the same orientation when the page is rotated on the vertical axis of the page.

Information required by this chapter that is submitted to the commission on paper and not electronically shall be electronically scanned and published on the Internet by the commission, in a format accessible to the general public, within two working days after the commission receives the information.

Notwithstanding the requirement in (a) of this section that a candidate shall make a full report upon a form prescribed by the commission, the commission shall accept information submitted electronically by a candidate if the information is

entered onto a version of a form accessed on the Internet website of the commission; or

in the form of an electronic spreadsheet or data file that contains field names and data types that conform to a standard defined by the commission.

For purposes of (b), (e), and (j) of this section, “contributor” means the true source of the funds, property, or services being contributed.

Every individual, person, nongroup entity, or group that contributes more than $2,000 in the aggregate in a calendar year to an entity that made one or more independent expenditures in one or more candidate elections in the previous election cycle, that is making one or more independent expenditures in one or more candidate elections in the current election cycle, or that the contributor knows or has reason to know is likely to make independent expenditures in one or more candidate elections in the current election cycle shall report making the contribution or contributions on a form prescribed by the commission not later than 24 hours after the contribution that requires the contributor to report under this subsection is made. The report must include the name, address, principal occupation, and employer of the individual filing the report and the amount of the contribution, as well as the total amount of contributions made to that entity by that individual, person, nongroup entity, or group during the calendar year. For purposes of this subsection, the reporting contributor is required to report and certify the true sources of the contribution, and intermediaries, if any, as defined by AS

15.13.400

(18). This contributor is also required to provide the identity of the true source to the recipient of the contribution simultaneously with providing the contribution itself.

For purposes of (e) of this section,

“director” means a member of the board of directors of a corporation or any person performing a similar function with respect to any organization;

“officer” means a president, vice-president, secretary, treasurer, principal financial officer, or comptroller of a corporation, or any person routinely performing functions similar to those of a president, vice-president, secretary, treasurer, principal financial officer, or comptroller with respect to any organization.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1974; am § 13 ch 189 SLA 1975; am § 33 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 4 ch 126 SLA 1994; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 48 SLA 1996; am §§ 6, 7 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1998; am §§ 3 — 6 ch 1 SLA 2002; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 1 TSSLA 2002; am §§ 2 — 7 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 9 ch 99 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 2 ch 155 SLA 2004; am § 3, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 1; am §§ 6 — 9 ch 47 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 95 SLA 2008; am §§ 3 — 7 ch 36 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 2010; am §§ 1, 2 ch 1 SLA 2012; §§ 6 and 7, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (n) was enacted as subsection (o). Relettered in 2004, at which time former subsection (n) was relettered as subsection (o). Subsection (o) was enacted as (p) and relettered in 2007, at which time former subsection (o) was relettered as (p) [now (q)]. Subsection (p) was enacted as (r) and relettered in 2012, at which time former subsections (p) and (q) were relettered as (q) and (r).

In 2010, in (e) of this section, “AS

15.13.110(h)

” was substituted for “AS

15.13.110(g)

” to reflect the 2010 relettering of the subsection.

Subsection (r) was enacted as (s) and relettered in 2020, at which time former (r) was relettered as (s).

Cross references. —

For a temporary exception to the electronic filing requirement in (m) of this section, see § 5, ch. 1, SLA 2012, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.
For a transition provision covering reports filed after December 1, 2011 and before February 21, 2012, see § 6, ch. 1, SLA 2012, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (j)(3), added “, and for all contributions described in (2) of this subsection in excess of $2,000 in the aggregate during a calendar year, the true source of such contributions and all intermediaries, if any, who transferred such funds, and a certification from the treasurer that the report discloses all of the information required by this paragraph” following “employer of the contributor” and made a stylistic change; added (s) [now (r)].

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 16, ch. 73. SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of (k) of this section applies “to an initiative, the application for which is filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

on or after September 9, 2010.”

Under § 7, ch. 1, SLA 2012, the 2012 amendment of (m) of this section and the enactment of (p) of this section are retroactive to December 1, 2011.

Sec. 15.13.045.
Investigations, hearings.

The commission may issue subpoenas, administer oaths, hold hearings, and conduct investigations.

In conjunction with (a) of this section, the commission may compel the attendance of witnesses and production of papers, books, records, accounts, documents, and testimony, and may have the deposition of witnesses taken in a manner prescribed by court rule or law for the taking of depositions in civil actions when consistent with the powers and duties assigned to the commission by this chapter.

The commission may examine the papers, books, records, accounts, and documents of any person subject to this chapter to ascertain the correctness of a report filed with the commission, or in conjunction with an investigation or inspection conducted under (a) of this section.

Subpoenas may be issued and shall be served in the manner prescribed by AS

44.62.430

and court rule. The failure, refusal, or neglect to obey a subpoena is punishable as contempt in the manner prescribed by law or court rule. The superior court may compel obedience to the commission’s subpoena in the same manner as prescribed for obedience to a subpoena issued by the court.

History.

(§ 14 ch 189 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska public offices commission complaints and investigations, see 2 AAC 50, art. 3.

For legislative financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 5.

Sec. 15.13.050.
Registration before expenditure.

Before making an expenditure in support of or in opposition to a candidate or before making an expenditure in support of or in opposition to a ballot proposition or question or to an initiative proposal application filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

, each person other than an individual shall register, on forms provided by the commission, with the commission.

If a group intends to support only one candidate or to contribute to or expend on behalf of one candidate 33 1/3 percent or more of its funds, the name of the candidate shall be a part of the name of the group. If the group intends to oppose only one candidate or to contribute its funds in opposition to or make expenditures in opposition to a candidate, the group’s name must clearly state that it opposes that candidate by using a word such as “opposes,” “opposing,” “in opposition to,” or “against” in the group’s name. Promptly upon receiving the registration, the commission shall notify the candidate of the group’s organization and intent. A candidate may register more than one group to support the candidate; however, multiple groups controlled by a single candidate shall be treated as a single group for purposes of the contribution limit in AS

15.13.070(b)(1)

.

If a group intends to make more than 50 percent of its contributions or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a single initiative on the ballot, the title or common name of the initiative must be a part of the name of the group. If the group intends to make more than 50 percent of its contributions or expenditures in opposition to a single initiative on the ballot, the group’s name must clearly state that the group opposes that initiative by using a word such as “opposes,” “opposing,” “in opposition to,” or “against” in the group’s name.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1974; am § 15 ch 189 SLA 1975; am § 8 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 2002; am §§ 2, 3 ch 73 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 16, ch. 73. SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of (a) of this section and the provisions of (c) of this section apply “to an initiative, the application for which is filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

on or after September 9, 2010.”

Sec. 15.13.052.
Independent expenditures; political activities accounts.

Before making an independent expenditure in support of or in opposition to a candidate or before making an independent expenditure in support of or in opposition to a ballot proposition or question, each person other than an individual, candidate, or nongroup entity with an annual operating budget of $250 or less shall establish a political activities account. The political activities account may be a separate account in the person’s general treasury. The political activities account must be administered using generally accepted accounting principles. All funds used by the person to make independent expenditures must be drawn from the person’s political activities account.

Records necessary to substantiate that the requirements of (a) of this section have been met must be made available for inspection by the commission.

Each person who has established a political activities account under this section shall preserve all records necessary to substantiate the person’s compliance with the requirements of this section for each of the six preceding years.

History.

(§ 8 ch 36 SLA 2010)

Sec. 15.13.060.
Campaign treasurers.

Each candidate and group shall appoint a campaign treasurer who is responsible for receiving, holding, and disbursing all contributions and expenditures, and for filing all reports and statements required by law. A candidate may be a campaign treasurer.

Each group shall file the name and address of its campaign treasurer with the commission at the time it registers with the commission under AS

15.13.050

.

Each candidate for state office shall file the name and address of the campaign treasurer with the commission, or submit, in writing, the name and address of the campaign treasurer to the director for filing with the commission, no later than 15 days after the date of filing the declaration of candidacy or the nominating petition. Each candidate for municipal office shall file the name and address of the campaign treasurer with the commission no later than seven days after the date of filing the declaration of candidacy or the nominating petition. If the candidate does not designate a campaign treasurer, the candidate is the campaign treasurer.

In the case of the death, resignation, or removal of a campaign treasurer, the candidate shall appoint a successor as soon as practicable and file the successor’s name and address with the commission within 48 hours of the appointment. The candidate is disqualified if found to have been in wilful violation of this subsection.

A campaign treasurer may appoint as many deputy campaign treasurers as necessary. The candidate shall file the names and addresses of the deputy campaign treasurers with the commission.

The candidate is responsible for the performance of the campaign treasurer, and any default or violation by the treasurer also shall be considered a default or violation by the candidate if the candidate knew or had reason to know of the default or violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1974; am §§ 16 — 19 ch 189 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 133 SLA 1977; am § 35 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 15.13.065.
Contributions.

Individuals, groups, nongroup entities, and political parties may make contributions to a candidate. An individual, group, or nongroup entity may make a contribution to a group, to a nongroup entity, or to a political party.

A political party may contribute to a subordinate unit of the political party, and a subordinate unit of a political party may contribute to the political party of which it is a subordinate unit.

Except for reports required by AS

15.13.040

and

15.13.110

and except for the requirements of AS

15.13.050

,

15.13.060

, and

15.13.112

—

15.13.114

, the provisions of AS

15.13.010

—

15.13.116

do not apply to limit the authority of a person to make contributions to influence the outcome of a ballot proposition. In this subsection, in addition to its meaning in AS

15.80.010

, “proposition” includes

an issue placed on a ballot to determine whether

a constitutional convention shall be called;

a debt shall be contracted;

an advisory question shall be approved or rejected; or

a municipality shall be incorporated;

an initiative proposal application filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 1 SLA 2002; am § 4 ch 73 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in subsection (c), “AS

15.80.010

” was substituted for “AS 15.60.010” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 15.60.010.

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 16, ch. 73, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of the provisions of (c) of this section apply “to an initiative, the application for which is filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

on or after September 9, 2010.”

Collateral references. —

Construction and application of Supreme Court’s holding in Citizens United v. Federal Election Com’n, 130 Sct. 876, 175 L.ED. 2d 753 (2010) that government may not prohibit independent and indirect corporate expenditures on political speech, 65 ALR6th 503.

Sec. 15.13.067.
Who may make expenditures.

Only the following may make an expenditure that is not an independent expenditure in an election for candidates for elective office:

the candidate;

an individual;

a group that has registered under AS

15.13.050

; and

a nongroup entity that has registered under AS

15.13.050

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 1 SLA 2002; am § 9 ch 36 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For campaign disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 2.